Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 186A Automated Motor Vehicle Registration System
186A.195.
Submission of title lien statement — Entry of information by county clerk — Certificate of registration — Pending lien — Fee for filing through electronic system — Perfection of security interest. [Effective January 1, 2024]

As used in this section, submission of a title lien statement refers to the presentation of a title lien statement, along with the fees required under KRS 64.012(1)(b), to the cabinet through any county clerk’s office in the Commonwealth.

Upon submission of a title lien statement, the county clerk shall use the information on the form to note the security interest on the certificate of title in accordance with KRS 186A.190(9). Title lien statements may be made available to the general public. However, public availability of a title lien statement shall not be considered necessary or effective to perfect a security interest in property required to be registered or titled in accordance with this chapter.

If the submission of a title lien statement accompanies the application for first title of any property in the name of an owner, the county clerk shall enter the information required by KRS 186A.190(9) into the system of record so as to allow the cabinet to:

Use the system of record as a centralized, statewide repository for lien filings; and

Produce a certificate of title bearing the information designated by KRS 186A.190(9), as well as any other information required by the cabinet.

After the information has been entered, the county clerk shall produce a certificate of registration, if required.

If the form prescribed by KRS

186A.060

indicates a pending lien, but the title lien statement does not accompany the application for title, the county clerk shall enter into the system of record the name and address of the lienholder or that a lien is pending. The county clerk shall indicate a title shall not be issued until either the title lien statement and the required fees are submitted, or in thirty (30) days, whichever occurs first. The county clerk shall then issue the registration.

After submission of the title lien statement, the county clerk shall enter the date of lien notation and the notation number into the system of record, enabling the cabinet to record the lien in the system of record and produce a title.

If a certificate of title is issued after the thirty (30) day time window identified in subsection (4) of this section has expired without the notation of a security interest, or if a title has been issued because there was no provision made for a lien to be noted within thirty (30) days, a secured party wishing to note a security interest on a title shall submit a title lien statement. The county clerk shall enter the information required by KRS 186A.190(9) into the system of record and a new certificate of title reflecting the security interest shall be produced.

The fee for the filing of a title lien statement through the electronic title application and registration system shall be transferred electronically to the county clerk of the county in which the debtor resides.

The security interest noted on the certificate of title shall be deemed perfected at the time the security interest attaches in accordance with KRS

355.9-203

if the secured party submits a properly completed title lien statement with application for first title or, in the case of property previously titled in the name of the debtor, within thirty (30) days of attachment. Otherwise, the security interest shall be deemed perfected at the time that the title lien statement is submitted.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 36, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 118, § 98, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 132, § 4, effective March 31, 1988; 1996, ch. 297, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 408, § 181, effective July 1, 2001; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 31, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 119, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 18, § 6, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.196.
Validity of existing lien. [Repealed.]

186A.197.
Issuance of certificate of title noting existing liens. [Repealed.]

186A.200.
Time period for presentation of title and title lien statement. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

With respect to a vehicle previously titled in the name of its debtor, the secured party shall, within thirty (30) days after execution of the security agreement, obtain the current certificate of title in the name of the debtor, with no more than one (1) prior lien indicated thereon, and present to the county clerk the certificate of title, which the secured party shall have the right to obtain from the debtor, together with the title lien statement and the required fees in KRS

186A.190

to the county clerk.

For failure to present both the title and title lien statement within the time prescribed by subsection (1) of this section, the secured party shall pay a penalty of two dollars ($2) to the county clerk as a prerequisite for noting the security interest on the title.

The county clerk shall enter the information required by KRS 186A.190(9) into the automated system.

The county clerk shall record upon the title in the appropriate section the information designated by KRS 186A.190(9).

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 37, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 118, § 99, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 297, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 128, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 408, § 182, effective July 1, 2001; 2017 ch. 31, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 119, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The motor vehicle lien statement is meant to replace financing statements on those motor vehicles for which a certificate of title is required.

OAG 87-39

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Weinberg, Graham and Stipanowich, Modernizing Kentucky’s Uniform Commercial Code, 73 Ky. L.J. 515 (1984-85).

186A.200.
Time period for submission of title lien statement — Penalty — Entry of information into system. [Effective January 1, 2024]

With respect to a vehicle previously titled in the name of its debtor, the secured party shall, within thirty (30) days after execution of the security agreement, submit a title lien statement in accordance with KRS

186A.195

.

For failure to present the title lien statement within the time prescribed by subsection (1) of this section, the secured party shall pay a penalty of two dollars ($2) to the county clerk as a prerequisite for noting the security interest on the title.

The county clerk shall enter the information required by KRS 186A.190(9) into the system of record established under KRS

186A.195

, enabling the cabinet to record the lien in the system of record and produce a title.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 37, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 118, § 99, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 297, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 128, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 408, § 182, effective July 1, 2001; 2017 ch. 31, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 119, § 3, effective July 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 18, § 7, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.205.
Clerk to enter lien assignment into system. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

Whenever a security interest is assigned as provided by KRS 186.045(4), the county clerk of a county that is operating under automated procedures shall, in addition to carrying out his requirements stated therein, enter the record of lien assignment into the automated system in the manner directed by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 38, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 118, § 100, effective July 1, 1987; 2003, ch. 103, § 6, effective June 24, 2003.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/24/2003). Although the subsection relating to assignment of perfected security interests was deleted from KRS

186.045

by 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 408, sec. 178, that Act failed to include a conforming amendment either to change the reference to that subsection in this section or to repeal this section in its entirety.

186A.205.
Clerk to enter lien assignment into system. [Effective January 1, 2024]

Whenever a security interest is assigned as provided by KRS 186.045(4), the county clerk shall enter the record of lien assignment into the system of record established under KRS

186A.195

in the manner directed by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 38, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 118, § 100, effective July 1, 1987; 2003, ch. 103, § 6, effective June 24, 2003; 2022 ch. 18, § 10, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.210.
Clerk to release lien assignment. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

When a security interest has been discharged under the provisions of KRS 186.045(3), the county clerk shall discharge the security interest and remove the lien information from AVIS.

When a security interest has been discharged as provided by KRS 186.045(4), the county clerk of a county that is operating under automated procedures shall, upon receiving a termination statement, within five (5) days enter the record of termination into the automated system. The automated system shall be programmed to allow a county clerk in a county where the termination statement was not received to access the automated system to determine the county and date that the record of termination was entered into the automated system. The clerk of the county where the termination statement was received shall then release the lien recorded upon the title in the manner directed by the Department of Vehicle Regulation, and take such other action with respect to a termination as is directed by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 39, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 118, § 101, effective July 1, 1987; 2003, ch. 103, § 3, effective June 24, 2003.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/24/2003). 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 408, sec. 178, renumbered the former subsection (2) of KRS

186.045

as subsection (1), but that Act failed to include a conforming amendment to change the reference to that subsection in former subsection (1) of this statute. Under KRS 7.136(1)(e), that change has now been made.

186A.210.
Duties of clerk when security interest has been discharged. [Effective January 1, 2024]

When a security interest has been discharged under the provisions of KRS 186.045(3), the county clerk shall discharge the security interest and remove the lien information from AVIS.

When a security interest has been discharged as provided by KRS 186.045(4), the county clerk shall, upon receiving a termination statement, within five (5) days enter the record of termination into the system of record established under KRS

186A.195

, and take such other action with respect to a termination as is directed by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 39, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 118, § 101, effective July 1, 1987; 2003, ch. 103, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2022 ch. 18, § 11, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.215.
Procedures for transfer of vehicle ownership.

If an owner transfers his interest in a vehicle, he shall, at the time of the delivery of the vehicle, execute an assignment and warranty of title to the transferee in the space provided therefor on the certificate of title, except if the space provided therefor on the owner’s certificate of title fails to meet the Kentucky requirements for lawful conveyance of title or if the space provided therefor on the owner’s certificate of title fails to meet the requirements for the owner to execute an odometer disclosure statement as required by federal law in effect at the time transferor executes an assignment and warranty of title. Pursuant to the exceptions provided by this subsection and in other cases where applicable, the transferor shall execute an assignment and warranty of title to the transferee by executing the application as provided by the Department of Vehicle Regulation and available from the county clerk. The transferor shall cause the application with the certificate of title attached to be delivered to the transferee.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the transferee shall, promptly after delivery to him of the vehicle, execute the application for a new certificate of title and registration. If an application is required by subsection (1) of this section, the transferee shall execute the applicable portions provided to him by his transferor. Any unexpired registration shall remain valid upon transfer of said vehicle to the transferee.

The application with its supporting documentation attached shall promptly be submitted to the county clerk as provided in KRS

186A.115

, together with the required fees.

If it comes to the attention of a transferor that a transferee did not promptly submit the necessary document within fifteen (15) calendar days to the county clerk as required by law in order to complete the transfer transaction, a transferor shall submit to the county clerk, in his county of residence, an affidavit that he has transferred his interest in a specific vehicle, and the clerk shall enter appropriate data into the AVIS system which shall restrict any registration transaction from occurring on that vehicle until the transfer has been processed. The Transportation Cabinet may adopt administrative regulations governing this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to any transactions involving licensed Kentucky motor vehicle dealers.

This section shall not apply to a vehicle which has had the title surrendered to a county clerk or a hulk vehicle. Hulk vehicle shall mean a vehicle or part thereof that is:

In a rusted, wrecked, discarded, worn out, extensively damaged, dismantled, and mechanically inoperative condition; or

Of an apparent value of less than two hundred dollars ($200).

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 40, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 36, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 98, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 35, § 5, effective July 15, 1996.

186A.220.
Requirements for motor vehicle dealer upon receipt of vehicle.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, when any motor vehicle dealer licensed in this state buys or accepts such a vehicle in trade, which has been previously registered or titled for use in this or another state, and which he holds for resale, he shall not be required to obtain a certificate of title for it, but shall, within fifteen (15) days after acquiring such vehicle, notify the county clerk of the assignment of the motor vehicle to his dealership and pay the required transferor fee.

Upon purchasing such a vehicle or accepting it in trade, the dealer shall obtain from his transferor, properly executed, all documents required by KRS

186A.215

, to include the odometer disclosure statement thereon, together with a properly assigned certificate of title.

The dealer shall execute his application for assignment upon documents designated by the Department of Vehicle Regulation, to the county clerk of the county in which he maintains his principal place of business. Such clerk shall enter the assignment upon the automated system.

The dealer shall retain the properly assigned certificate of title received from his transferor, and may make any reassignments thereon until the forms for dealer assignment on the certificate of title are exhausted. The Department of Vehicle Regulation may, if it deems it warranted, provide a special document to allow for additional dealer assignments without requiring system generated documents.

When a dealer assigns the vehicle to a purchaser for use, he shall deliver the properly assigned certificate of title, and other documents if appropriate, to such purchaser, who shall make application for registration and a certificate of title thereon.

The dealer may, with the consent of the purchaser, deliver the assigned certificate of title, and other appropriate documents of a new or used vehicle, directly to the county clerk, and on behalf of the purchaser, make application for registration and a certificate of title. In so doing, the dealer shall require from the purchaser proof of insurance as mandated by KRS

304.39-080

before delivering possession of the vehicle.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

186.020

,

186A.065

,

186A.095

,

186A.215

, and

186A.300

, if a dealer elects to deliver the title documents to the county clerk and has not received a clear certificate of title from a prior owner, the dealer shall retain the documents in his possession until the certificate of title is obtained.

When a dealer assigns a vehicle to a purchaser for use under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the transfer and delivery of the vehicle is effective immediately upon the delivery of all necessary legal documents, or copies thereof, including proof of insurance as mandated by KRS

304.39-080

.

The department may make available, upon proper application from a licensed motor vehicle dealer, electronic means by which the dealer can interface directly with AVIS and the department. If the department grants this access, all fees currently required for the issuance of a certificate of title shall continue to be charged and remitted to the appropriate parties as provided by statute.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall assure that the automated system is capable of accepting instructions from the county clerk that a certificate of title shall not be produced under a dealer registration situation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 41, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 98, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 35, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 128, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2016 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

186A.225.
Forms used when transferring vehicle or trailer.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall establish appropriate forms and procedures to be utilized in connection with the transfer of a motor vehicle or trailer by operation of law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 42, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.230.
Assignment titles used by motor vehicle dealers.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring that a trade-in vehicle received by a motor vehicle dealer licensed in this state must be titled by assignment in the dealer’s name substantially, simultaneously with the registration or titling of the vehicle toward which the trade-in vehicle was received.

Licensed motor vehicle dealers shall be allowed to title by assignment a trade-in vehicle into their name if they possess an original or a copy of a title for the trade-in or in lieu thereof an affidavit. The affidavit shall contain the existing owner’s name, address, make, year, model, vehicle identification number, license plate number, decal number, title number, if available, and the dealer’s name, address and telephone number and any additional information required by the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 43, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.235.
Owner to notify clerk of residence or name change.

Whenever any person after making application for or obtaining a certificate of registration or title for a vehicle, shall move from the address named in the application or shown upon a registration card or certificate of title, such person shall within fifteen (15) days thereafter notify the county clerk of the county in which he resides in writing of his old and new addresses as well as the current license number of all vehicles currently registered or titled in his name. The county clerk shall immediately enter such change into the automated system.

Whenever the name of any person who has made application for or obtained a certificate of registration or title for a vehicle is thereafter changed by marriage or otherwise, such person shall within fifteen (15) days notify the county clerk of the county of residence of such former and new name. The county clerk shall immediately enter such change into the automated system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 44, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.240.
Cancellation of title erroneously issued.

When any certificate of registration or certificate of title has been issued in error to a person not entitled to the certificate, or contains incorrect information or information has been omitted from the certificates, the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall notify in writing the person to whom the certificates have been issued or delivered and such person shall immediately return such certificate within forty-eight (48) hours, together with any other information necessary for the adjustment of the records related to it, to the county clerk of the county in which the title was originally applied for, or as otherwise directed by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

Upon receipt of the certificates and information requested, the county clerk and the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall coordinate the production of a corrected certificate of registration and certificate of title, and the cancellation of the erroneous documents by the Department of Vehicle Regulation, and ensure that corrected documents are sent to the appropriate party.

Production of corrected documents shall be carried out under procedures similar to those applicable to production of an original certificate of title. The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall supply to the county clerk such forms as may be needed to assure documentation of corrective action in accordance with this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 45, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.245.
Duplicate certificate of title — Fee.

If a certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed or becomes illegible, the owner or legal representative of the owner named in the certificate shall promptly make application to the county clerk for and may obtain a duplicate, upon furnishing information satisfactory to the Department of Vehicle Regulation. The duplicate certificate of title shall contain appropriate words or symbols to indicate that it is a duplicate. Each application for a duplicate certificate of title shall be six dollars ($6), of which the county clerk shall retain four dollars ($4), and the Transportation Cabinet two dollars ($2). Each application for a duplicate certificate of title for an all-terrain vehicle shall be ten dollars ($10), of which the county clerk shall retain four dollars ($4) and the Transportation Cabinet shall receive six dollars ($6). It shall be mailed to the owner.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall make provisions for production and issuance of a duplicate title if update of information is requested. The provisions shall be generally consistent with the procedures for production and issuance of a certificate of title in the first instance as provided in this chapter.

A person recovering an original certificate of title for which a duplicate has been issued shall promptly surrender the original certificate to the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

Application for documents provided for by this section shall be made to the county clerk upon forms provided to him by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 46, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 428, § 33, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 255, § 10, effective January 1, 2007; 2009, ch. 64, § 4, effective June 25, 2009.

186A.250.
Suspension or revocation of title — Conditions and methods for action.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall suspend or revoke a certificate of title, after giving notice and providing a reasonable opportunity for the holder to be heard, when authorized by any other provision of law, or, if it finds:

The certificate of title was fraudulently procured or erroneously issued; or

The vehicle has been scrapped, dismantled, or destroyed. Suspension or revocation of a certificate of title does not, in itself, affect the validity of a security interest noted on it.

When the Department of Vehicle Regulation suspends or revokes a certificate of title, the owner or person in possession of it shall, immediately upon receiving notice of the suspension or revocation, mail or deliver the certificate to the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

The department shall promptly notify the Department of Kentucky State Police of the suspension or revocation of any certificate of title.

Any peace officer shall seize and impound any certificate of title which has been suspended or revoked except when such document is in the custody of the Department of Vehicle Regulation or the Department of Kentucky State Police.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 47, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 85, § 205, effective June 26, 2007.

186A.255.
Department of Vehicle Regulation to provide notice of fraudulent documents to State Police.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall promptly notify the Department of Kentucky State Police of the particulars of:

Any attempted or actual registration or titling in this state of a stolen motor vehicle, or trailer, or motor vehicle or trailer whose true identity is in doubt, of which it becomes aware;

Counterfeit, stolen, or altered ownership documents it receives; and

Attempts to supply, or supplying to it, of false or fraudulent information in any application for a certificate of registration, certificate of title for a motor vehicle or trailer in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 48, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 85, § 206, effective June 26, 2007.

186A.260.
Tampering with automated system prohibited.

No person, including a county clerk and his employees, shall willfully utilize or tamper with a telecommunications terminal, or associated devices, linked to the automated vehicle registration and titling system and capable of entering data or electronic signals into, altering information stored within, or obtaining information or electronic signals from, the automated vehicle registration and titling system unless:

He has current authorization from the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation to utilize the system;

He has, previous to utilizing such terminal or associated devices in a given county, satisfactorily completed an orientation as given by the Department of Vehicle Regulation concerning the forms, procedures, and use of the system, as certified by the county clerk or county clerk-elect of the county in which his use of the system will take place; and

He has been assigned, and has received, a unique personal identifying code or device from the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 49, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.265.
County clerk and employees to be trained and certified in system use.

Each county clerk, or county clerk-elect, shall, before utilizing or permitting his employees to utilize the automated vehicle registration and titling system, ensure that he and his employees have satisfactorily completed an orientation course regarding the forms, procedures and use of the system as instructed by the Transportation Cabinet.

The county clerk, or county clerk-elect, shall certify to the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation, those of his employees or prospective employees, who, together with himself, having satisfactorily completed the required orientation, will utilize the automated system under his direction.

His certification shall be made by printing or typing upon a form supplied by the Department of Vehicle Regulation, the name of his county, and as to himself and each of his employees who will utilize the system, their last name, first name, and where available middle initial, their birth date, and Social Security account number, as to each person shown upon the certificate. The county clerk shall sign and date the certificate following a preprinted statement that shall read: I certify under penalty of forgery in the second degree that the persons whose names appear above have satisfactorily completed an orientation on use of the automated vehicle registration and titling system as provided by this chapter and that the information supplied is true and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief. I will not willfully permit anyone other than those persons shown hereon, or on another certificate of this same type executed by me, and persons authorized in writing by the Department of Vehicle Regulation, to use telecommunications terminals linked to the automated system and under my control.

Each county clerk shall promptly notify the Department of Vehicle Regulation on a form supplied by it, of the name of any employee whose authorization to utilize the automated system has been terminated by him or whose employment by such clerk has ceased.

Every county clerk and each of his employees who is authorized to utilize the automated system shall promptly report to the Department of Vehicle Regulation any attempted, actual, or suspected misuse of the automated system of which they become aware.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 50, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.270.
Commissioner may suspend authority to utilize automated system.

Upon receiving notice that a person who has previously been authorized to utilize the automated system has willfully or negligently misused the automated vehicle registration and titling system, the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation may temporarily suspend such person’s authorization to utilize the system.

Whenever he suspends or revokes any person’s authorization to utilize the automated vehicle registration and titling system, the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall give immediate notice of such revocation to the person whose authorization has been suspended or revoked and if such person is not the county clerk, then notice shall be given also to the county clerk of the county in which the person is employed.

No person whose authorization to utilize the automated system has been suspended or revoked shall utilize such system following notice of such action until his authorization to utilize the system is restored by the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 51, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.275.
Entering false information to produce title document prohibited.

No county clerk or other person who is authorized to utilize the automated vehicle registration and titling system, shall knowingly enter into such system, information enabling the system to produce a certificate of title and registration, certificate of registration, or certificate of title, or enter the record of a lien or its release, unless he has in his official custody at the time he enters such information into the system, an application which he believes to be bona fide and in proper form, or if the information entry involves a lien, a proper financing or termination statement, which is consistent with the information he enters.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 52, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.280.
Entering false information into automated system prohibited.

No county clerk or other person shall knowingly enter any information or record into a telecommunications terminal or other device connected to the automated vehicle registration and titling system, knowing that the information or record entered into such device is false, fraudulent, illegitimate, or contains erroneous information that:

Creates, or enables the system to create, a certificate of title and registration, certificate of registration, or certificate of title, that is illegitimate or that contains information that is false, fraudulent or erroneous; or

Results in the system storing information or a record that is false, fraudulent or contains erroneous information; or

Fraudulently, illegitimately, or maliciously alters information or records stored within the system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 53, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.285.
Permission to connect automated system required — Exceptions — Notification of county attorney if vehicle is not properly insured.

No person shall, without prior specific written approval of the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation and the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology, connect with the automated vehicle registration and titling system, directly or indirectly, by wire, electronic, electromagnetic induction, systemic, or any other means, any device, system or apparatus capable of putting information or electronic signals into, or receiving information or electronic signals from, or blocking, diverting, or altering transmission of data or signals within, the automated vehicle registration and titling system, its components, and its communications network.

This section does not apply to or prohibit connection of devices or systems to the automated vehicle registration and titling system by persons who are acting in accordance with a contract or agreement with the Commonwealth of Kentucky, which in addition to any other required approval, has been approved in writing by the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation and the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 54, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 506, § 23, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 23, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 613, effective June 20, 2005.

186A.287.
Use of automated motor vehicle information system for titling and registration restricted to county clerks and Transportation Cabinet.

The ability to use the automated motor vehicle information system to carry out the functions of titling and registration of motor vehicles shall be restricted to county clerks and the Transportation Cabinet.

Any other access granted to the automated motor vehicle information system shall be for informational purposes only.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 5, § 6, effective January 1, 2013.

186A.290.
County clerk may omit sending duplicate copies of title.

Regardless of other provisions of the statutes, the county clerk may omit sending duplicates of each certificate of title and registration, or certificate of registration he issues, to the Transportation Cabinet and Department of Revenue, and the property valuation administrator, and may omit the production and filing of one of the copies formerly known as either county clerk’s alpha or his numeric copy, when it is determined by the agencies indicated that their need for “duplicates” of each certificate or “receipt” is obviated by the automated system.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation and the Department of Revenue shall, as agreed between them, provide appropriate system support or computerized listings on magnetic tape or disc, printouts, or system access, to fulfill the information needs formerly requiring duplicates of each certificate or receipt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 55, effective July 15, 1982; 2005, ch. 85, § 614, effective June 20, 2005.

186A.295.
Owner to surrender title on destroyed vehicle or trailer.

Any person or entity having a motor vehicle or trailer that has been destroyed, to the extent that its repair cannot be obtained through usual commercial repair services, at a cost less than its retail value as established from a value manual approved by the Department of Revenue, or from which two (2) or more parts which typically bear a vehicle identification number placed thereon by the manufacturer have been removed, or which he removes, shall surrender the certificate of title for such vehicle for which he has a certificate of title in his or another name, to the county clerk of the county in which such vehicle is located. The clerk shall immediately forward the surrendered title to Frankfort with instructions for canceling the title.

Any person or entity engaged in the sale of used motor vehicle or trailer parts, or the recycling or salvage of them, shall surrender the certificate of title for any vehicle in his possession, and for which he has a certificate of title, whether in his or another name, if such vehicle is destroyed within the meaning of paragraph (a) of this subsection, or from which two (2) or more parts which typically bear a vehicle identification number placed thereon by a manufacturer have been removed, or which he removes, to the county clerk of the county in which such vehicle is located. The clerk shall immediately forward the surrendered title to Frankfort with instructions for canceling the title.

The surrender of the certificate of title pursuant to this section shall be made within ten (10) working days, next succeeding the day when such vehicle was received, destroyed, or next succeeding the day during which such second part was removed.

Each county clerk shall receive without charge, a certificate surrendered in accordance with this section, cancel it, and remit it to the Department of Vehicle Regulation, and take any other action related to it, as required by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 56, effective July 15, 1982; 2005, ch. 85, § 615, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where an affidavit is filed with the county clerk stating that the affiant no longer has in his possession the title or plate to a motor vehicle, identified by license plate number, year, make, model number, vehicle identification number, and indicating the date of disposition of vehicle and title, and that the vehicle is junked or unfit for future use, the clerk may consider the described vehicle junked, under KRS 186.190(5) (now 186.190(4)) and should not require plate or decal renewal.

OAG 84-309

.